Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 104
HOLDING COMPANIES

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 HOLDING COMPANIES GENERALLY

PART 2 ACQUISITION OF CONTROL OF BANKS AND BANK HOLDING COMPANIES